Wyoming, session 2025, SF0094.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-15-111(b)(intro) and by creating a
new subsection (r) and 39-15-211 by creating a new
subsection (e) are amended to read:

39-15-111. Distribution.

(b) Revenues earned under W.S. 39-15-104 during each
fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that
fiscal year for accounting purposes. Except as otherwise
SF0094

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0146
provided in subsection (p) subsections (p) and (r) of this
section, for all revenue collected by the department under
W.S. 39-15-104 the department shall:

(r) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
all revenue collected under this article by the department
from remote sellers under W.S. 39-15-501 and 39-15-502 for
sales sourced to the Wind River Indian Reservation shall be
distributed to the Eastern Shoshone Tribe and Northern
Arapaho Tribe as provided in this subsection. The
department shall deduct one percent (1%) to cover all
administrative expenses and costs for deposit by the state
treasurer into the general fund for that amount. The
remaining amount shall be paid to each tribe as determined
by a separate agreement between each tribe and the state of
Wyoming. If an agreement is not in effect with a tribe, any
unpaid amount shall be retained by the department in the
account from which the funds would be paid until such time
as an agreement is reached with the Eastern Shoshone Tribe
and the Northern Arapaho Tribe.

39-15-211. Distribution.

SF0094

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0146
(e) Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (d) of
this section, all revenue collected by the department under
this article from remote sellers under W.S. 39-15-501 and
39-15-502 for sales sourced to the Wind River Indian
Reservation shall be distributed as set forth in W.S.
39-15-111(r).

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0094